test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-puhksama64_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `puhksama: # Verb (64) `puhksama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     puhksama+V+Inf/mA: puhksama
     puhksama+V+Inf: puhastaq
     puhksama+V+Act+PrfPrc: puhasnuq
     puhksama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: puhast
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puhksa
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puhksas
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puhksi
     puhksama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puhasʼ
